Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.150

Department of transportation, counties, cities, and other jurisdictions may fund transportation improvements.

The department of transportation, counties, cities, and other jurisdictions may give funds to districts for the purposes of financing transportation improvements under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 336 s 14; 1987 c 327 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.